src/hyphenation/hyphenation.xfscript
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================= !
! Hyphenator for Skolt Sámi !
! ========================= !

! This is a file copied from sme via smn. It needs to be adjusted for sms.

echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>

define Vow       [ a | á | e | i | o | u | y | æ | ø | å | ä | ö | õ |
                   A | Á | E | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å | Ä | Ö | Õ |
é | ó | ú | í | à | è | ò | ù | ì | ë | ü | ï | â | ê | ô | û | î | ã | ý
É | Ó | Ú | Í | À | È | Ò | Ù | Ì | Ë | Ü | Ï | Â | Ê | Ô | Û | Î | Ã | Ý ] ;

define 2ndVow [ e | a | u | o | i | y | ø | E | A | U | O | I | Y | Ø ] ;

!define 3dVow [ u | U ] ;


define VowNot2ndVow   [ Vow - 2ndVow ] ;

!define VowNot3dVow   [ Vow - 3dVow ] ;


define U   [ u | U ] ;
define O   [ o | O ] ;
define A   [ a | A ] ;
define E   [ e | E ] ;
define I   [ i | I ] ;
define Y   [ y | Y ]  ;
define EO  [ e | E | o | O ] ;
define EOA [ e | E | o | O | a | A ] ;
define IAO [ i | I | a | A | o | O ] ;
define Oslash   [ ø | Ø ] ; ! Renamed from Ø to avoid non-ASCII chars
define UI  [ u | U | i | I ] ;


define IEdipht [ i e | I e | I E ] ;
define UOdipht [ u o | U o | U O ] ;
define EAdipht [ e a | E a | E A ] ;
define OAdipht [ o a | O a | O A ] ;
define OUdipht [ o u | O u | O U ] ;      ! jour-na-lis-sta
define AUdipht [ a u | A u | A U ] ;      ! fau-na, Lauv-sjø-vo-la, Kår-ve-jau-re ok.
define EUdipht [ e u | E u | E U ] ;      ! leut-nán-ta
define AEdipht [ a e | A e | A E ] ;      ! lae-sta-di-us,
define OslashYdipht [ ø y | Ø y | Ø Y ] ; ! nøyt-rála  ! Renamed from ØYdipht to avoid non-ASCII chars
define OEdipht [ o e | O e | O E ] ; ! goe-the
define IOslashdipht [ i ø | I ø | I Ø ] ; ! skiøld     ! Renamed from IØdipht to avoid non-ASCII chars
define IOdipht [ i o | I o | I O ] ; ! skiold, nation



!define EAUtripht [ e a u | E a u | E A U ] ; !Bor-deaux, Beau-fort
!define IEUtripht [ i e u | I e u | I E U ] ; !Nieu-siedler



define dipht [ IEdipht | UOdipht | EAdipht | OAdipht | OUdipht | AUdipht |
               EUdipht | AEdipht | OslashYdipht | OEdipht | IOslashdipht | IOdipht] ;

!define tripht [ EAUtripht | IEUtripht ] ;

define VowNotU      [ Vow - U   ] ;
define VowNotO      [ Vow - O   ] ;
define VowNotA      [ Vow - A   ] ;
define VowNotE      [ Vow - E   ] ;
define VowNotI      [ Vow - I   ] ;
define VowNotEO     [ Vow - EO  ] ;
define VowNotEOA    [ Vow - EOA ] ;
define VowNotIAO    [ Vow - IAO ] ;
define VowNotY      [ Vow - Y   ] ;
define VowNotOslash [ Vow - Oslash   ] ;  ! Renamed from VowNotØ to avoid non-ASCII chars
define VowNotUI     [ Vow - UI  ] ;
define LongVow      [ a a | e e | i i | o o | u u | á á | ä ä | ö ö ] ;

define Cns [ b | c | č | ʒ | ǯ | d | đ | f | g | ǥ | ǧ | h | j | k | ǩ | l | m | n | ŋ |
             B | C | Č | Ʒ | Ǯ | D | Đ | F | G | Ǥ | Ǧ | H | J | K | Ǩ | L | M | N | Ŋ |
             p | q | r | s | š | t | ŧ | v | w | x | z | ž |
             P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | V | W | X | Z | Ž ] ;

define S    [ S | s | Š | š ] ;
define Cnss [ Cns - S ] ;
define Sgm  [ Cns | Vow ] ;


!define Cns [ Cnssymb | Vow i ] ;

echo << Rules>>

define afterlong   [..] -> %^ ||                LongVow Cns* _ Cns Vow ;
define beforedipht [..] -> %^ ||      Vow                    _ dipht ;  !a^ie, e^ao, o^uo, u^ea etc! Any diphth, bled by savetripht later on.
define nodipht     [..] -> %^ ||  Cns Vow                    _ VowNot2ndVow (Sgm) ; !e^å, e^ä etc
!define notripht   [..] -> %^ ||  Cns Vow     VowNot2ndVow   _ U (Sgm) ; ! Not needed?
define NotOslhYdi  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotOslash   _ Y (Sgm) ; !a^y, e^y etc
define NotOAdipht  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotEO       _ A (Sgm) ; !i^a, u^a etc
define NotXUdipht  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotEOA      _ U (Sgm) ; !y^u, i^u etc
define NotUOdipht  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotUI       _ O (Sgm) ; !a^o, i^o etc
define NotIEdipht  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotIAOE     _ E (Sgm) ; ! u^e etc
define NotIOslhdi  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotI   _ Oslash (Sgm) ; !i^a, i^u etc
define 4cns        [..] -> %^ || Vow r           _ d n j ,
                                 Vow Cns         _ s t r               Vow ,
                                 Vow     k s     _ p [ l | r | s | n ] Vow ,
                                 Vow n [ k | g ] _ s j                 Vow ; !gar^dnjil etc
!define unvoiced    [..] -> %^ || Vow (Cns)                         _ h [ n | m | l | j | r ] Vow ; !guv^hli 

! FUOM: čállinrávvagat: 
! Giellalávdegoddi lea dolin mearridan ahte dj, hj, hl, lj, hm, hn, nj, ja hr
! ii galgga juohkit, danin go dát bustávat čállojuvvojit oktii ja dain 
! guðesge dušše okta konsonántajietnadat. Dán mearrádusa berret mii du
! nu ahte go fal lea vejolaš, de ii berre daid juohkit.
! Go gemináhtakonsonánttaid galgá dábálaččat juohkit guovtte sadj
! ái, de ii leat vuogas sáni juohkit ná: da-hje, čái-hni, bea-lje-sku-h
! ran. Maiddái dáid sániid berre juohkit váldonjuolggadusa miel
! de: dah-je, čáih-ni, beal-je-skuh-ran.

define unvoicedwg  [..] -> %^ || Vow (Cns) h [ n | m | l | j | r ] _   [ n | m | l | j | r ] Vow ; !guvhl^li
define dissnas     [..] -> %^ || Vow         [ đ | i | l | r | v ] _ [ b m | d n (j) | g ŋ ] ; !ráv^dnji
! define palatal     [..] -> %^ || Vow (Cns) Cns _ d j ,
!                                  Vow (Cns) Cns _ l j ,
!                                  Vow (Cns) Cns _ n j ,
!                                  Vow (Cns) Cns _ n j ,
!                                  Vow           _ n j ; !ád^djá etc
!                                 !, Vow     t   _ n j ; ! Redefining palatal as follows, look into this one!
define palatal     [..] -> %^ || Vow (Cns) Cns _ d j ,
                                 Vow (Cns) Cns _ l j ,
                                 Vow (Cns) Cns _ n j ;
!                                 Vow           _ n j ; !o^lju, bo^njan etc, removed: Vow _ d j , Vow  _ l j (causes o^ljju) , until we get decision from SGL, commented out, see comment on line 103 (TO)
define s2cns       [..] -> %^ || Vow [ Cns | i ]            ( %> ) _ [s|š] Cnss  Vow ; ! mái-stit (if commented out: máis-tit)
define s2cnswg     [..] -> %^ || Vow [ Cns | i ] [s|š] Cnss ( %> ) _ Cnss ( %> ) Vow ; !máist^tán
define 3cns        [..] -> %^ || Vow [ Cns | i ]       Cns  ( %> ) _ Cns  ( %> ) Vow ; !biil^la
!define foreign    [..] -> %^ || Vow                        ( %> ) _ g r         Vow ; !para^gráfa
define xcns        [..] -> %^ || x                          ( %> ) _      ( %> ) Vow ; !sex^a
define 2cns        [..] -> %^ || Vow [ Cns | i ]            ( %> ) _ Cns  ( %> ) Vow ; !áh^ku
define 1cns        [..] -> %^ || Vow                        ( %> ) _ Cns  ( %> ) Vow ; !jo^ga


! The philosophy here is to remove some boundaries who, when seen also in a left
! context, are parts of triphthongs, and thus should not be divided. We do it
! via restoring, in order not to mess up our diphthong rules.

define savetripht  %^ -> 0 || e _ a u ;  ! does  work... !Bor-deaux, Beau-fort
define savetripht2 %^ -> 0 || i _ e u ;  ! does  work... !Nieu-siedler
define savetripht3 %^ -> 0 || i _ o u ;  ! does  work... !Sioux
define saveaa      %^ -> 0 || a _ a ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish
define saveii      %^ -> 0 || i _ i ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish
define saveuu      %^ -> 0 || u _ u ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish
define saveoo      %^ -> 0 || o _ o ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish
define saveöö      %^ -> 0 || ö _ ö ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish
define saveyö      %^ -> 0 || y _ ö ;    ! does  work... !työläinen Finnish
define saveyy      %^ -> 0 || y _ y ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish
define saveee      %^ -> 0 || e _ e ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish
define saveää      %^ -> 0 || ä _ ä ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish


define removedouble  %^ -> 0 || %- _ ;
define removedouble2 %^ -> 0 || _ %- ;
define removedouble3 %# -> 0 || %- _ ;
define removedouble4 %# -> 0 || _ %- ;

echo <<Combining...>>

read regex [
!notripht
!.o.
afterlong
.o. beforedipht
.o. nodipht
.o. NotOslhYdi
.o. NotOAdipht
.o. NotXUdipht
.o. NotUOdipht
.o. NotIEdipht
.o. NotIOslhdi
.o. 4cns
!.o. unvoiced
.o. unvoicedwg
.o. dissnas
.o. palatal
.o. s2cns
.o. s2cnswg
.o. 3cns
!.o. foreign
.o. xcns
.o. 2cns
.o. 1cns
.o. savetripht
.o. savetripht2
.o. savetripht3
.o. saveaa
.o. saveii
.o. saveuu
.o. saveoo
.o. saveöö
.o. saveyö
.o. saveyy
.o. saveee
.o. saveää
.o. removedouble
.o. removedouble2
.o. removedouble3
.o. removedouble4
 ] ;



! For quick compilation, comment the following line in:
!save h.fst ;
! Then, at the command line, give this command:
! xfst -utf8 < src/hyph-sme.txt
! As a result, a temporary h.fst file will be saved in sme/, it can be called
! with e.g. "lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 h.fst", or in a pipe.
